Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB90.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 533.272 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A pilot program shall be established in no more[less] than twenty (20)[ten (10)] counties selected by the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court to participate in a behavioral health conditional dismissal program. The pilot
program shall begin January 1, 2023, and shall continue until January 1, 2031,[last for four (4) years] unless
extended or limited by the General Assembly.
(2) Each participating county shall have access to:
(a) Medication-assisted treatment;
(b) Recovery services as defined under KRS 533.270; and
(c) Educational and vocational resources sufficient to provide the training and assistance required under
KRS 533.286.
(3) (a) Every behavioral health treatment program provider in the pilot program shall collect and maintain data
as provided in this subsection relating to program participants under their care, designed to inform the
outcomes and effectiveness of the pilot program, to be submitted to the Administrative Office of the
Courts as provided under paragraphs (b) to (e) of this subsection.
(b) A report shall be made for each program participant no later than fourteen (14) days following the
initiation of treatment. The data to be collected and submitted in the report shall include the following
information regarding each participant:
1. Age, gender, and race or ethnicity;
2. Housing history;
3. Educational history;
4. Employment history;
5. Past involvement in addiction recovery and treatment for a substance use disorder;
6. Past treatment for a mental health disorder; and
7. Criminal history.
(c) A second report shall be made for each program participant identified in paragraph (b) of this
subsection no later than twenty-eight (28) days after filing the initial report and shall provide the
progression of the program participant, including but not limited to:
1. Continuation in the program;
2. The status and type of recommended treatment;
3. Employment or job training;
4. The status and type of educational training;
5. Housing status;
6. Any other information the program provider determines may assist in evaluation of the pilot
program; and
7. If the participant has been discharged from the program due to an inability or unwillingness to
meet the terms and conditions of the treatment program, including the specific reason for the
discharge.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Subsequent reports shall be filed on a quarterly basis. The initial quarterly report shall be submitted no
later than April 15, 2023, with reports due thereafter on January 15, April 15, July 15, and October 15
of each year of the pilot program. The quarterly reports shall include for the reporting period:
1. The information required under paragraph (c) of this subsection as it relates to each program
participant, including the length of time the individual has been a program participant;
2. The number of clinical assessments performed by the program provider;
3. The total number of individuals participating in the behavioral health conditional dismissal
program with that provider;
4. The number of individuals who remain in compliance with the terms and conditions of the
treatment program;
5. The number of individuals who have been discharged from the program due to an inability or
unwillingness to meet the terms and conditions of the treatment program, including the specific
reason for the discharge;
6. For any individual discharged under subparagraph 5. of this paragraph, the length of time the
individual participated in the program;
7. The number of individuals who have been discharged from the program upon successful
completion of the treatment program requirements;
8. The number of individuals who have received medication-assisted treatment and the result of that
treatment;
9. The number of individuals who have completed a recommended job skills or job training
program; and
10. The number of individuals who have completed a recommended educational component of the
program.
(e) A final report shall be filed for each program participant no later than thirty (30) days following
discharge from the program and shall contain, at a minimum, the following information:
1. If the discharge from the program was due to an inability or unwillingness to meet the terms and
conditions of the treatment program the:
a. Specific reason for the discharge;
b. Length of time the individual participated in the program;
c. Goals met during the participation period;
d. Identified barriers to completion of the program, if known; and
e. Recommended adjustments to the behavioral health conditional dismissal program that
could provide a greater probability of successful completion to similar participants; and
2. If the discharge from the program occurred upon successful completion of the program
requirements:
a. The length of time the individual participated in the program;
b. A summary of the specific programs completed and goals attained by the participant;
c. What continued treatment, if any, is recommended; and
d. Recommended adjustments to the behavioral health conditional dismissal program that
could provide greater benefit to similar participants.
(4) The attorneys for the Commonwealth participating in the pilot program shall submit quarterly reports to the
Administrative Office of the Courts. The initial quarterly report shall be submitted no later than April 15,
2023, with reports due thereafter on January 15, April 15, July 15, and October 15 of each year of the pilot
program. The quarterly reports shall include for the reporting period:
(a) The number of eligible defendants, including the defendant's race, ethnicity, and gender, who were
offered participation in the behavioral health conditional dismissal program but declined to participate;

CHAPTER 122 3
(b) The number of eligible defendants, including the defendant's race, ethnicity, and gender, who sought to
participate in the program but whose participation was not agreed to by the attorney for the
Commonwealth;
(c) The number of victims, if there is an identified victim, who did not participate in the process; and
(d) The number of victims, if there is an identified victim, who did not agree to the defendant's participation
in the program.
(5) If the attorney for the Commonwealth did not agree to an eligible defendant's participation in the behavioral
health conditional dismissal program, he or she shall include in each quarterly report to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the specific offenses charged for that defendant, and the substantial and compelling
reasons, based upon delineated facts specific to the defendant, why the defendant was denied participation in
the program.
(6) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall submit an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission,
the chair of the Senate Standing Committee on Judiciary, the chair of the House Standing Committee on
Judiciary, and the Governor by January 31 of each year that includes the information received from the
attorneys for the Commonwealth and the providers for the counties participating in the behavioral health
conditional dismissal program. The report shall include the information reported under subsections (3) to (5) of
this section and shall also include:
(a) The number of defendants assessed who did not meet the eligibility requirements for the program
following the clinical assessment;
(b) The specific offenses charged for each defendant and the classification of offenses charged;
(c) The percentage of defendants participating in the program who successfully completed the program;
(d) The percentage of defendants discharged from the program for noncompliance; and
(e) The percentage of defendants who are arrested, convicted, and incarcerated within:
1. Six (6) months:[,]
2. One (1) year;[, and]
3. Two (2) years;
4. Three (3) years;
5. Four (4) years; and
6. Five (5) years;
of successful completion of the program.
(7) (a) The annual report required in subsection (6) of this section shall also include the information
required under subsection (6)(e) of this section for defendants arrested, convicted, and incarcerated
of a qualifying offense as defined in KRS 533.270 in counties not participating in the program.
(b) The information required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be obtained for defendants in
counties of similar population and geographical location to a county participating in the program.
Section 2. KRS 533.288 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Behavioral Health Conditional Dismissal Program Implementation Council is created for the purpose of
assisting with the implementation of the behavioral health conditional dismissal pilot program created under
KRS 533.272.
(2) The membership of the council shall include the following:
(a) The executive director of the Office of Drug Control Policy, or his or her designee, who shall serve as
chair of the council;
(b) The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, or his or her designee;
(c) The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities, or his or her designee;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) The commissioner of the Kentucky Department for Medicaid Services, or his or her designee;
(e) The public advocate, or his or her designee;
(f) A member of the Kentucky Commonwealth's Attorneys' Association, elected by its membership;
(g) A member of the Kentucky County Attorneys Association;
(h) One (1) Circuit Judge, elected by the Circuit Judges Association of Kentucky;
(i) One (1) District Judge, elected by the District Judges Association of Kentucky;
(j) The executive director of the Office of Adult Education, or his or her designee;
(k) The executive director of the Kentucky Jailers Association, or his or her designee; and
(l) Two (2) individuals selected by the Kentucky Association of Regional Programs, one (1) of whom shall
be in recovery from a substance use disorder and one (1) of whom is being treated or has been treated
for a mental health disorder as defined in KRS 533.270.
(3) The council shall meet at least quarterly. Meetings shall be held at the call of the chair, or upon the written
request of two (2) members to the chair.
(4) The council shall:
(a) Oversee the implementation of the behavioral health conditional dismissal program pilot project; and
(b) Review the data collected by the Administrative Office of the Courts and report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Judiciary and the Governor by October 1 of each year of the pilot project regarding:
1. Recommendations for any additional performance measures needed to promote the success of
the program;
2. Whether any action is necessary, including funding or legislation;
3. Recommendations for resolving any matters that reduce the effectiveness of the program; and
4. Any additional information the council deems appropriate.
(5) Members shall not receive any additional compensation for their service on the council but shall be reimbursed
for all necessary expenses.
(6) The council shall be attached to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for administrative purposes.
(7) The council shall terminate December 31, 2031[December 31, 2027], unless extended by the General
Assembly.
Section 3. 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 230, sec. 13 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding KRS 15.291 and 15.293(5), there is hereby appropriated Restricted Funds in the amount
$10,500,000 in each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022, and ending June 30, 2026, from the Opioid Abatement
Trust Fund to the Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities budget unit for the behavioral health
conditional dismissal program described in Sections 1 to 8 of this Act. The department shall reimburse the
Administrative Office of the Courts for administrative costs related to the program up to $500,000 per year.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys not expended at the close of fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not lapse but shall
be carried forward.
Section 4. KRS 210.040 is amended to read as follows:
The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:
(1) Exercise all functions of the state in relation to the administration and operation of the state
facilities[institutions] for the care and treatment of persons with mental illness;
(2) Establish or acquire, in accordance with the provisions of KRS 56.440 to 56.550, other or additional facilities
for psychiatric care and treatment of persons who are or may become state charges;
(3) Cooperate with other state agencies for the development of a statewide mental health program looking toward
the prevention of mental illness and the aftercare[post-institutional care] of persons released from public or
private mental hospitals;

CHAPTER 122 5
(4) Provide for the custody, maintenance, care, and medical and psychiatric treatment of the patients of the
facilities[institutions] operated by the cabinet, including emergency and other medical care required to be
provided outside of the facility while the patient is admitted to the facility. Expenses of the outside medical
provider, other than elective procedures or elective surgery, shall be paid by the cabinet and included in the
determination of the patient liability when not covered by the patient's third-party payor;
(5) Provide psychiatric consultation for the state penal and correctional institutions, and for the state
facilities[institutions] operated for children or for persons with an intellectual disability;
(6) Administer and supervise programs for the [noninstitutional ]care of persons with mental illness outside of
state facilities;
(7) Administer and supervise programs for the care of persons with chronic mental illness, including but not
limited to provision of the following:
(a) Identification of persons with chronic mental illness residing in the area to be served;
(b) Assistance to persons with chronic mental illness in gaining access to essential mental health services,
medical and rehabilitation services, employment, housing, and other support services designed to enable
persons with chronic mental illness to function outside inpatient facilities[institutions] to the maximum
extent of their capabilities;
(c) Establishment of community-based transitional living facilities with twenty-four (24) hour supervision
and community-based cooperative facilities with part-time supervision; provided that, no more than
either one (1) transitional facility or one (1) cooperative facility may be established in a county
containing a city of the first class or consolidated local government with any funds available to the
cabinet;
(d) Assurance of the availability of a case manager for each person with chronic mental illness to determine
what services are needed and to be responsible for their provision; and
(e) Coordination of the provision of mental health and related support services with the provision of other
support services to persons with chronic mental illness;
(8) Require all providers who receive public funds through state contracts, state grants, or reimbursement for
services provided to have formalized quality assurance and quality improvement processes, including but not
limited to a grievance procedure; and
(9) Supervise private mental hospitals receiving patients committed by order of a court.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version